Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-456
Unlawful enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person subject to this code who effects an enlistment or appointment in or a separation from the military forces of any person who is known to him to be ineligible for that enlistment, appointment, or separation because it is prohibited by law, regulation, or order shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 56, p. 1575.